src-fst-morphology-affixes-numerals.lexc.md
Noun inflection for Võro

* Yaml: **suhvli**

* Yaml: **kerge**

* Yaml: **peraedue**

* Yaml: **peraedue**

* Yaml: **tervues**

* Yaml: **A-ainus**

* Yaml: **N-oppaja5**

* Yaml: **N-mängjä5**

* Yaml: **fueuesiga**

kipõnʼ:kipõn
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

allaś:allas
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

veteĺ:vetel
* Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**

tukõv:tukõv
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

elläi:elläi
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

verrev:verrev
* Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**

gradation: no

gradation: yes
distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation

distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h

distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h

kotus:kotus
* Yaml: **N-kotus15**

inemine:inemi
* Yaml: **N-inemine16**

abilinõ:abili
* Yaml: **N-abilinw16**

LEXICON NUM_22VWROKWNW  võrokõnõ:võrokõ

LEXICON NUM_22NAANW  naanõ:naa

Gradation: No

vowel_harmony: front

Gradation: No

tarõ:tar

pesä:tar

nimi:nim

* LEXICON NUM_36KATS1  katś:kat

* LEXICON NUM_36UETS1  ütś:üt

kokr:ko%{kg%}r
* Yaml: **N-kokr36**

sõbõr:sõbõr
* Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
derived from 36särǵ

* Yaml: **aig, kand**

* Yaml: **juht́**

* Yaml: **aig, aig**

LEXICON NUM_43KANARIK 

LEXICON NUM_44SWDA  sõda:sõda

* Yaml: **N-jalg, N-hain**

* Yaml: **N-jalg, N-tark**

vro-digits

* **LEXICON ARABICCASES**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE0**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON DIGITCASES**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE0**

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE**

* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD** ordinals

* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR** ordinal inflection when preceded
by .:, and with reduced case forms. The Err/Orth tag is added in the calling lexicon.

* **LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL** collectives

* **LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL**

* **LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS**  ! arabic as first part,

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc)</small>

---
